California statutes. Education Code
(e) “Engineer of record” means the architect, if no structural engineer or civil engineer has been retained for the structural design.

(f) “Electrical engineer” means an electrical engineer, as defined in Section 6702.1 of Chapter 7 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(g) “Mechanical engineer” means a mechanical engineer, as defined in Section 6702.2 of Chapter 7 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(h) “Qualified inspector” means a person who is currently certified by the International Conference of Building Officials or who has demonstrated his or her competence to the satisfaction of the enforcement agency as having expertise and experience in the particular type of construction or operation requiring inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17324.

The appropriate enforcement agency that meets the requirements of Sections 17331 and 17332 shall review the design and inspect the construction, reconstruction, structural alteration, or addition to any private school structure to the extent necessary to ensure that drawings and specifications comply with the applicable sections of the Uniform Building Code and to ensure that construction work has been performed in accordance with the approved drawings and specifications, and the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17325.

Private school structures of one-story Type V and Type II N construction, as defined by the Uniform Building Code, that are 2,000 square feet or less in floor area are exempt from the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17326.

(a) Prior to adopting any drawings or specifications for the private school structure, the governing board, authority, owner, corporation, or other agency proposing to construct any private school structure shall submit the design calculations, drawings, and specifications of the private school structure to the appropriate enforcement agency. The enforcement agency shall stamp the drawings and specifications if the construction or alteration is approved by the enforcement agency. Included with the stamp shall be the signature of the qualified person referred to in Sections 17333 and 17334.

(b) The provisions of this section are not applicable to private school construction or alteration contracts entered into prior to July 1, 1987.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17327.

The application for approval of the drawings and specifications for private school structures shall be accompanied by comprehensive and complete drawings, design calculations, specifications, and a soil analysis at a level of detail appropriate to the proposed structure and site, all of which shall comply with the requirements prescribed by the enforcement agency. This review shall not preclude incremental submission and approval of drawings and specifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17328.

The enforcement agency shall approve or reject all drawings and specifications for the construction or alteration of private school structures and in doing so shall review the submitted design calculations, drawings, and specifications to ensure compliance with the requirements of this article. A record shall be kept by the enforcement agency indicating that design calculations, drawings, and specifications have been reviewed and conform with the applicable sections of the Uniform Building Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17329.

All drawings and specifications shall be prepared under the responsible charge of an architect, civil engineer, or structural engineer, who shall sign all drawings and specifications that are to be approved by the enforcement agency. Observation of the work of construction shall be under the general responsible charge, as defined by Section 6703 of Chapter 7 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, of the architect, civil engineer, or structural engineer who signed the drawings, except that drawings and specifications not involving architectural or structural conditions may be prepared and the construction work may be administered by a registered professional engineer qualified in the branch of engineering that is appropriate to the drawings, specifications, estimates, and construction work.

If the architect, civil engineer, or structural engineer is unable to exercise general responsible charge of construction another architect, civil engineer, or structural engineer shall be retained to exercise general responsible charge of construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17330.

Except as provided in Section 17326, on or after July 1, 1987, construction of a private school structure shall not commence unless the structure’s drawings and specifications comply with the provisions of this article and the requirements prescribed by the enforcement agency, and approval of those drawings and specifications has been obtained from the enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17331.

During construction or alteration of a private school structure, the building owner shall provide for, and the local enforcement agency shall require, special inspection by a qualified inspector when needed, as determined by the local enforcement agency. Continuous inspection is not required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17332.

An enforcement agency is qualified to undertake the review of plans, drawings, and specifications for a private school structure if the enforcement agency has a structural engineer, either on its staff or under contract, that is responsible for all design review conducted by the enforcement agency and the record prepared under Section 17328.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17333.

A jurisdiction whose enforcement agency does not meet the qualifications specified in Sections 17331 and 17332 shall obtain necessary qualified personnel to meet the requirements of this article by contracting with other public agencies, private sector firms, or individuals qualified to perform the necessary services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17334.

During the construction of a private school structure, the enforcement agency shall require the engineer of record responsible for the structural design, or that engineer’s authorized representative, to make periodic reviews of construction at the construction site to observe compliance with the approved structural plans, specifications, and change orders. The engineer of record in general responsible charge of the work of construction, and the registered professional engineer, shall make a report, duly verified by him or her through periodic review of construction, showing that the work done during the period covered by the report has been performed and that the materials used and installed are in accordance with the approved drawings and specifications. Any detailed statements of fact required by the enforcement agency shall be included. These observations and statements shall not be relied upon by others as acceptance of the work, nor shall they be construed to relieve the contractor in any way of his or her obligations and responsibilities under the construction contract.

“Periodic review of construction,” as used in this section and as applied to the architect, civil engineer, structural engineer, or the registered professional engineer, means the knowledge that is obtained from periodic visits of reasonable frequency to the project site for the purpose of general observation of the work. It also means the knowledge that is obtained from the reporting of others as to the progress of the work, testing of materials, inspection, and superintendence of the work that is performed between those periodic visits of the architect, civil engineer, or structural engineer, or the registered engineer. The exercise of reasonable diligence to obtain the facts is required. “Periodic review of construction” does not include responsibility for superintendence of construction processes, site conditions, operations, equipment, personnel, or maintenance of a safe place to work or any safety in, on, or about the site of work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17335.

Prior to the issuance of a Certificate of Occupancy, the engineer of record shall state in writing to the enforcement agency that, in exercising his or her reasonable professional judgment and to the best of his or her knowledge, information, and belief, the private school structure was constructed in substantial conformity with the approved plans and specifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17336.

Any person who willfully violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Building Schoolhouses [17340. - 17343.]

17340.

The governing board of any school district may, and when directed by a vote of the district shall, build and maintain a schoolhouse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17342.

The governing board of any school district, whenever in its judgment it is desirable to do so, may establish additional schools in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17343.

The governing board of any school district may purchase property and construct and equip buildings in an area after the legal action has been taken that will result in annexation of the area to the school district, but before the annexation has become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Factory-Built School Buildings [17350. - 17360.]

17350.

It is the intent of this article to provide an alternative procedure to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) for the construction and installation of factory-built school buildings not over 1,000 square feet in area designed or intended for use as school buildings. As used in this article, a “factory-built building” means any building designed or intended for use as a school building which is either wholly manufactured or is in substantial part manufactured at an offsite location in accordance with building standards adopted and approved pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18935) of Part 2.5 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code and other regulations adopted by the Department of General Services, to be assembled or erected on a schoolsite. Any such building purchased or leased by a school district shall be deemed to be the construction or alteration of a school building as those terms are used in Article 2 (commencing with Section 17260) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter, and all of the provisions of each of those articles, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, shall apply with respect to factory-built buildings designed or intended for use as school buildings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17351.

Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, the Department of General Services shall adopt regulations for the safety of design and construction of factory-built buildings for use as school buildings, and shall prescribe procedures for the plans, specifications, methods of construction, and estimates of cost of a factory-built school building to be submitted to the department for approval as provided in Section 17352. Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, such regulations shall comply with but not be limited by the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 17260) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter.

The Department of General Services shall adopt and submit building standards for approval pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18935) of Part 2.5 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code for the purposes described in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17352.

A manufacturer of factory-built buildings designed or intended for use as school buildings shall submit to the Department of General Services and the State Department of Education for approval, its plans, specifications, methods of construction, and estimates of cost of such buildings. At the same time the manufacturer shall pay to the Department of General Services a deposit to be applied toward the actual expenses in an amount as determined by the Department of General Services based on the estimated cost of such factory-built buildings, but not exceeding 0.5 percent of such estimated cost. The minimum deposit in any case shall be fifty dollars ($50). The manufacturer shall reimburse the Department of General Services and the State Department of Education for the actual expenses incurred by those departments in the review of such plans and specifications.

All fees received by the Department of General Services pursuant to this article are subject to the provisions of Section 17301.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17353.

All plans, specifications and estimates shall be prepared by a certified architect holding a valid license under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or by a structural engineer holding a valid certificate to use the title structural engineer under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and the supervision of the work of construction in the factory shall be under the responsible charge of such an architect or structural engineer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17354.

The Department of General Services, in accordance with standards and procedures adopted pursuant to Section 17351, and as such standards and procedures may thereafter be modified, shall either approve or reject such plans, specifications, and methods of construction. Approval shall not be given unless such plans, specifications, and methods of construction are in accordance with standards adopted by the department pursuant to Section 17351. The department may establish procedures for the inspection of the facilities and manufacturing processes of a manufacturer to determine the manufacturer’s ability to produce factory-built school buildings in accordance with the plans, specifications, and methods of construction which the manufacturer has submitted to the department. The Department of General Services shall notify the State Department of Education of its approval of a manufacturer’s plans, specifications, and methods of construction of a factory-built school building.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17355.

The Department of General Services shall provide for competent, adequate, and continuous inspection during construction in the factory to insure that all work has been performed and materials used and installed, in every particular, in accordance with the approved plans and specifications. The manufacturer shall reimburse the department for the costs incurred for such inspection as determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17356.

From time to time, as the work of construction in the factory progresses and whenever the Department of General Services requires, the certified architect or structural engineer in responsible charge of the supervision of the work of construction in the factory, the inspector on the work, and the manufacturer shall each make to the Department of General Services a report, duly verified by him or her, upon a form prescribed by the Department of General Services, showing, of his or her own personal knowledge, that the work during the period covered by the report has been performed, and materials used and installed, in every particular, in accordance with the approved plans and specification, setting forth such detailed statements of fact as are required by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17357.

Upon the Department of General Services’ approval of a manufacturer’s plans, specifications, and methods of construction of a factory-built school building, a school district, whenever it is otherwise required by any of the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 17260), or Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter to submit to the Department of General Services or to the State Department of Education the plans and specifications for the construction of a school building may, instead, include in its application for approval to each of such departments a notification that it intends to utilize such factory-built school building. The plans and specifications for the factory-built building to be utilized shall be submitted with the application and notification for identification purposes. Before granting its approval for the use of such buildings, the Department of General Services shall insure that the plans, specifications, and methods of construction of the buildings have been approved and are in accordance with standards adopted by the department pursuant to Section 17351 which are in effect at the time the application for approval is passed upon by the department. Whenever a school district complies with the alternative procedure prescribed by this section it shall not be required to pay the filing fee prescribed by Sections 17267 and 17300, except that a fee shall be charged for onsite work pursuant to Section 17358. If the submitted plans and specifications have not been previously approved the application shall be rejected. In such case a new application together with required documents shall be filed for approval of plans and specifications by either the manufacturer pursuant to the provisions of Section 17352 or by the school district pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17358.

Whenever a school district has contracted for the purchase or lease of a factory-built school building and where such building is to be supported by foundations, underpinning, pedestals, or similar type elements which extend more than 18 inches above natural grade at any point, or on temporary blocks or jacks of any height, all the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter shall apply to the design and construction of onsite work except that, for fee purposes, only the estimated cost of onsite work need be considered. The minimum amount in any case shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17359.

The provisions of Sections 17266, 17268, 17300, 17302, and 17309 shall not apply with respect to the manufacture, sale, or lease of factory-built school buildings if this article is otherwise complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17360.

Sections 17297, 17302, 17307, 17309, and 17311 shall not apply with respect to the design and construction of onsite work except where required by Section 17358.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Fitness for Occupancy [17365. - 17374.]

17365.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) By an urgency act (Stats. 1933, Ch. 59), the Legislature at the 1933 General Session established reasonable minimum standards for the design and construction of new school buildings, as now defined in Section 17283. Although it was not required that then existing school buildings incorporate these standards, it was intended by the Legislature that in the intervening years continuous progress would be made in the repair, reconstruction or replacement of such school buildings.

(b) Progress toward this end has been outstanding since 1971 as a result of state funds being made available for rehabilitating or replacing structurally unsafe school facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17366.

It is the intent of the Legislature to reexamine the progress under this article from time to time. To enable it to do so, and to expedite the provision of safe educational facilities for California schoolchildren, the Legislature intends that the governing board of each school district adopt a plan for the orderly repair, reconstruction, or replacement of school buildings not repaired, reconstructed, or replaced in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17367.

The governing board of any school district which has in use for school purposes any school buildings which were not constructed under approved plans and the supervision and inspection requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter shall have such buildings examined pursuant to this section and shall have completed on or before January 1, 1970, the examination, reporting and estimate requirements of this section and Section 39223.

Whenever an examination of the structural condition of any school building of a school district has been made by the Department of General Services, or by any licensed structural engineer or licensed architect for the governing board of the school district, or under the authorization of law, and a report of the examination, including the findings and recommendations of the agency or person making the examination, has been made to the governing board of the district, and the report shows that the building is unsafe for use, the governing board of the district shall immediately have prepared an estimate of the cost necessary to make such repairs to the building or buildings as are necessary, or, if necessary, to reconstruct or replace the building so that the building when repaired or reconstructed, or any building erected to replace it, shall meet such standards of structural safety as are established in accordance with law. The estimate shall be based on current costs and may include other costs to reflect modern educational needs. Also an estimate of the cost of replacement based on the standards established by the State Allocation Board for area per pupil and cost per square foot, shall be made and reported.

The report required by this section shall include a statement that each of the buildings examined is safe or unsafe for school use. For the purpose of this statement the sole consideration shall be protection of life and the prevention of personal injury at a level of safety equivalent to that established by Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted thereunder, disregarding, insofar as possible, such building damage not jeopardizing life which would be expected from one disturbance of nature of the intensity used for design purposes in said rules and regulations.

The governing board, utilizing the information acquired from the examination and report developed pursuant to this section, shall establish a system of priorities for the repair, reconstruction, or replacement of unsafe school buildings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17368.

“School building” as used in this article shall be limited to any physical structure capable of being occupied by pupils, but shall exclude, (a) any bleacher or grandstand with less than six rows of seats, (b) any building which is used exclusively for warehouse, storage, garage, or districtwide administrative office purposes, into which pupils are not required to enter, and buildings utilized by adult schools for off-campus, voluntary adult education courses or registered apprentice courses, (c) any swimming pool, or (d) any yard or lighting poles or flagpoles or playground equipment which does not exceed 35 feet in height.

“School building” as used in this article excludes any building owned or occupied by a unified school district, high school district, or a county superintendent of schools which is used exclusively for adult education purposes.

If any building so excluded was not constructed in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter and was not repaired, reconstructed, or replaced in accordance with this article, there shall be posted in a conspicuous place on such building a public notice stating that such building does not meet the structural standards imposed by law for earthquake safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17369.

“School building” as used in this article excludes any building operated by an official or board of a public entity for purposes other than educational, notwithstanding any educational use thereof incidental to the other primary purpose.

For purposes of this section, a public entity includes, but is not limited to, a city, city and county, county, or special district, but does not include a school district or county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17370.

Except as provided in Section 17371, nothing in this article shall be construed as relieving any member of the governing board of a school district of any liability for injury to persons or damage to property imposed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17371.

No member of the governing board of a school district shall be held personally liable for injury to persons or damage to property resulting from the fact that a school building was not constructed under the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter, if such governing board complies with the provisions of this article. Such limit on liability shall commence when such governing board initiates action to comply with the provisions of Section 17367.

A licensed structural engineer or licensed architect employed by a governing board to examine any school building under this article shall not be held personally liable for injury to persons or damage to property as a result of the structural inadequacy and failure of a building, provided he or she has exercised normal professional diligence in carrying out his or her functions under Article 3 (commencing with Section 39140) of this chapter and the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17372.

No school building examined and found to be unsafe for school use pursuant to Section 17367 and not repaired or reconstructed in accordance with the provisions of this article, and no school building which has never met the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter, shall be used as a school building for elementary or secondary school purposes after June 30, 1975, unless the governing board of the school district has requested and obtained from the State Allocation Board authority for use of the building for a specific period beyond that date. Prior to requesting this authority, the governing board shall adopt a resolution declaring the board’s intention to utilize the building as a school building after June 30, 1975, pending its repair, reconstruction, or replacement. The State Allocation Board shall not authorize any school district to use a building beyond June 30, 1975, unless it has first determined that the school district has already proceeded with a plan of total repair, reconstruction, or replacement in a timely manner and a contract has been let for any phase of, and work commenced on, the project. In no event shall the State Allocation Board authorize the use of any unsafe facilities for a period extending beyond the completion of the replacement facilities or beyond June 30, 1977, whichever occurs first.

For purposes of this section, “school building” does not include any portable building. Portable buildings may be used beyond June 30, 1975 to meet temporary housing needs until all repair, reconstruction or replacement of all district school buildings is complete or until June 30, 1977, whichever occurs first, provided that the governing board of the district has requested and obtained from the State Allocation Board authority for use of such portable buildings. The State Allocation Board may grant this authority only to those districts in which 20 percent or more of the schools are subject to partial or complete reconstruction pursuant to Section 17367. Any portable buildings for which authority is granted for temporary use pursuant to this section shall not be subject to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) or Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365) of this chapter during the period of the authorized use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17373.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or Article 9 (commencing with Section 16310) of Chapter 6 of Part 10, whenever a school district does not have funds available to repair, reconstruct, or replace the school buildings referred to in this article or Section 16320, the school district shall apply for any funds that may be necessary to accomplish the repair, reconstruction, or replacement pursuant to Article 9. The school district shall also accept any funds that are disbursed to the district pursuant to Article 9, whether or not the funds constitute the maximum amount applied for, and shall repay the funds in accordance with Article 9. In cases in which funds derived from a tax increase levied pursuant to Section 39230, as amended by Section 147 of Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 1977, or Section 39230.5, as enacted by Section 2 of Chapter 1010 of the Statutes of 1976, are utilized to match amounts disbursed to a school district under an apportionment made pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 16310) of Chapter 6 of Part 10, the disbursement and repayment may be made without the necessity of a vote of the electorate of the district as prescribed in any provision of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16000) of Part 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17374.

Any revenue derived from an increase in the rate of tax provided by Section 39230, as amended by Section 147 of Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 1977, prior to July 1, 1975, and which is unexpended on that date, may be used after July 1, 1975, by the governing board of a school district to complete the corrective structural repair, reconstruction, or replacement of any school building subject to Section 17367 which had not been completed on that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Full-Day Kindergarten Facilities Grant Program [17375. - 17376.]

17375.

(a) (1) The California Preschool, Transitional Kindergarten and Full-Day Kindergarten Facilities Grant Program is hereby established, under the administration of the State Allocation Board pursuant to the requirements of this section, to provide one-time grants to school districts to construct new school facilities or retrofit existing school facilities for the purpose of providing transitional kindergarten classrooms and full-day kindergarten classrooms pursuant to Section 8973, and for the construction of new preschool classrooms, the modernization of existing preschool classrooms, or the modernization of existing kindergarten and grade 1 to 12, inclusive, classrooms that would be converted to provide California state preschool programs operated by school districts on a public schoolsite, pursuant to this
 section.

(2) Moneys appropriated pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the California Preschool, Transitional Kindergarten, and Full-Day Kindergarten Facilities Account, hereby created in the State Treasury, administered by the State Allocation Board.

(3) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the State Allocation Board to provide one-time grants as specified in this section, as it read on December 31, 2020.

(4) (A) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of four hundred ninety million dollars ($490,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the State Allocation Board to provide one-time grants as specified in this section. The funds appropriated in this subparagraph shall be available
 for encumbrance or expenditure by the State Allocation Board until June 30, 2027.

(B) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the 2021–22 fiscal year to the State Allocation Board to provide one-time grants as specified in this section. The funds appropriated in this subparagraph shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the State Allocation Board until June 30, 2028.

(C) (i) Of the moneys allocated to a school district from the appropriation made pursuant to this paragraph, savings and interest achieved upon full completion of an approved project, and as a result of a school district’s efficient and prudent expenditure of the moneys allocated, may be used for professional development or instructional materials to build capacity for the implementation of a
 California state preschool program, a transitional kindergarten program, a full-day kindergarten program, or high priority capital outlay purposes identified by the school district and in accordance with subdivision (f), associated regulations, and any accompanying grant agreement.

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of the funds appropriated in support of this paragraph only, a school district may retain and use savings and interest pursuant to clause (i) even if it receives financial hardship assistance pursuant to Section 17075.10.

(iii) Savings and interest retained by a school district shall be expended within one year of project completion or returned to the state as required by associated regulations and any accompanying grant agreement.

(5) New school facilities built pursuant to this section
 shall not be included in the eligibility determination used for purposes of the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10).

(b) (1) The State Allocation Board shall award grants to school districts that lack the facilities to provide transitional kindergarten or full-day kindergarten as required for eligibility pursuant to Sections 17071.25 and 17072.10, that lack facilities that satisfy the design requirements required for new kindergarten classrooms as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 14030 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, or that lack the facility capacity to increase California state preschool program services.

(2) Priority for grants shall be given to school districts that meet either of the following criteria:

(A) The school district is financially unable to contribute a portion of, or all of, the local matching share required pursuant to paragraph (3) for a project, and meets the requirements for financial hardship pursuant to Sections 17075.10 and 17075.15. For purposes of this section, paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 17075.15 shall not apply.

(B) (i) For school districts seeking a transitional kindergarten or full-day kindergarten facilities grant, the school district is located in an underserved community with a high population of pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42238.01.

(ii) For school districts seeking a preschool facilities grant, the school district is located in an underserved area, as defined in Section 8205, that is
 prioritized to receive funds for the California state preschool program according to the prioritization process described in Section 8210.

(3) Except for school districts that meet the requirements for financial hardship pursuant to Section 17075.10 and as specified in paragraph (4), a school district that applies for a grant pursuant to this section for new construction shall provide 50 percent of the cost of the project, and a school district that applies for a grant pursuant to this section for a retrofit project shall provide 40 percent of the cost of the project.
